New York, session 2025-2026, A570.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph d of subdivision 4 of section 4402 of the educa- 2 tion law, as amended by chapter 371 of the laws of 2023, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 d. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, such board shall 5 provide suitable transportation up to a distance of fifty miles to and 6 from a nonpublic school which a child with a disability attends if such 7 child has been so identified by the local committee on special education 8 [and such child attends such school for the purpose of receiving 9 services or programs similar to special educational programs recommended 10 for such child by the local committee on special education]. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02411-01-5